Georgia statutes. TITLE 53 Wills, Trusts, and Administration of Estates
CHAPTER 3 Year’s Support

Cross references.

Prosecution by surviving spouse, children, and others of action concerning chose in action assigned by deceased plaintiff to spouse, children, and others as part of year’s support, §

9-2-30

.

Editor’s notes.

This chapter was effective January 1, 1998, to the extent that no vested rights of title, year’s support, succession, or inheritance are impaired, as provided by the version of Code Section 53-1-1 enacted by Ga. L. 1996, p. 504, § 10, as amended by Ga. L. 1997, p. 1352, § 1.

Ga. L. 1996, p. 504, § 10, effective January 1, 1998, repealed the Code sections formerly codified at this chapter, and enacted the current chapter.
The former chapter consisted of §§

53-3-1

through 53-3-80, and was based on Laws 1792, Cobb’s 1851 Digest, p. 307; Laws 1805, Cobb’s 1851 Digest, p. 283; Laws 1807, Cobb’s 1851 Digest, pp. 315, 1129; Laws 1810, Cobb’s 1851 Digest, pp. 284, 316; Laws 1838, Cobb’s 1851 Digest, p. 285; Laws 1845, Cobb’s 1851 Digest, p. 348; Ga. L. 1855-56, p. 233, § 14; Ga. L. 1859, p. 33, §§ 3-5; Orig. Code 1863, §§ 2390-2404, 2406, 2448, 2449; Ga. L. 1866, p. 66, § 1; Code 1868, §§ 2386-2400, 2402, 2444, 2445; Code 1873, §§ 2421-2435, 2437, 2480, 2481; Ga. L. 1878-79, p. 146, § 1; Code 1882, §§ 2421-2426, 2428-2435a, 2437, 2480; Ga. L. 1894, p. 102, §§ 1, 4-9; Civil Code 1895, §§ 3279-3292, 3294,
3296-3306, 3350, 3351; Ga. L. 1908, p. 85, §§ 1, 2; Civil Code 1910, §§ 3853-3866, 3868, 3870-3882, 3926, 3927; Code 1933, §§ 113-601 through 113-618, 113-620.1, 113-701 through 113-710; Ga. L. 1943, p. 423, § 1; Ga. L. 1945, p. 142, § 2; Ga. L. 1945, p. 401, § 1; Ga. L. 1946, p. 83, § 1; Ga. L. 1953, Jan.-Feb. Sess., p. 535, § 1; Ga. L. 1955, p. 217, § 1; Ga. L. 1958, p. 657, §§ 4-9; Ga. L. 1959, p. 136, §§ 2-4; Ga. L. 1961, p. 558, §§ 1, 3, 4; Ga. L. 1966, p. 455, §§ 1, 2; Ga. L. 1967, p. 28, §§ 1-5; Ga. L. 1975, p. 764, § 1; Ga. L. 1976, p. 640, § 1; Ga. L. 1978, p. 1605, § 1; Ga. L. 1983, p. 511, § 1; Ga. L. 1984, p. 658, § 1; Ga. L. 1984, p. 681, § 1; Ga. L. 1984, p. 834, §§ 3, 4; Ga. L. 1985, p. 149, § 53; Ga. L. 1985, p. 1650, §§ 1, 2; Ga. L. 1986, p. 436, § 1; Ga. L. 1986, p. 982, §§ 18, 19; Ga. L. 1990, p. 350, § 1.1; Ga. L. 1991, p. 394, §§ 1, 2; Ga. L. 1993, p. 1081, § 1; Ga. L. 1995, p. 10, § 53.

Law reviews.

For annual survey of law of wills, trusts, and administration of estates, see 38 Mercer L. Rev. 417 (1986).

For note, “Determining Eligibility for Year’s Support in Georgia: The Tension Between Status and Dependence Requirements,” see 22 Ga. L. Rev. 1167 (1988).

For annual survey of wills, trusts, and administration of estates law, see 41 Mercer L. Rev. 411 (1989).

53-3-1.
Preference and entitlement.

As used in this chapter, the terms “child” or “children” mean any minor child who would be entitled to inherit if the child’s parent died intestate.

Among the necessary expenses of administration and to be preferred before all other debts or demands, except as specifically provided otherwise in this chapter and notwithstanding any other provision of law to the contrary, is the provision of year’s support for the family.

The surviving spouse and minor children of a testate or intestate decedent are entitled to year’s support in the form of property for their support and maintenance for the period of 12 months from the date of the decedent’s death.

History.

Code 1981, §

53-3-1

, enacted by Ga. L. 1996, p. 504, § 10; Ga. L. 2020, p. 377, § 1-4/HB 865.

The 2020 amendment,

effective January 1, 2021, inserted “or demands” and “and notwithstanding any other provision of law to the contrary” in subsection (b).

Law reviews.

For article discussing decisions involving the year’s support provision of the Georgia Code, see 3 Ga. St. B.J. 427 (1967).

For article surveying recent legislative and judicial developments in Georgia’s real property laws, see 31 Mercer L. Rev. 187 (1979).

For article surveying legislative and judicial developments in Georgia’s will, trusts, and estate laws, see 31 Mercer L. Rev. 281 (1979).

For article surveying Georgia cases in the area of wills, trusts, and administration of estates from June 1979 through May 1980, see 32 Mercer L. Rev. 249 (1980).

For note, “Preventing Spousal Disinheritance in Georgia,” see 19 Ga. L. Rev. 427 (1984).

For annual survey of law of real property, see 38 Mercer L. Rev. 319 (1986).

For note on 1991 amendment of former O.C.G.A. §

53-5-2

, see 8 Ga. St. U.L. Rev. 216 (1992).

For note on 1993 enactment of former O.C.G.A. § 53-5-1.1, see 10 Ga. St. U.L. Rev. 236 (1993).

For annual survey article discussing wills, trusts, and administration of estates, see 51 Mercer L. Rev. 487 (1999).

For survey article on wills, trusts, guardianships, and fiduciary administration for the period from June 1, 2002 to May 31, 2003, see 55 Mercer L. Rev. 459 (2003).

For annual survey of wills, trusts, guardianships, and fiduciary administration, see 58 Mercer L. Rev. 423 (2006).

53-3-2.
Events barring right to support.

A surviving spouse’s right to year’s support shall be barred by the marriage or death of the spouse prior to the filing of the petition for year’s support.

A minor child’s right to year’s support shall be barred by the marriage or death of the minor or by the minor’s attaining the age of 18 years prior to the filing of the petition for year’s support.

History.

Code 1981, §

53-3-2

, enacted by Ga. L. 1996, p. 504, § 10.

53-3-3.
Provision in will in lieu of support; election.

A testator by will may make provision for the spouse in lieu of year’s support, in which case the surviving spouse must make an election.

History.

Code 1981, §

53-3-3

, enacted by Ga. L. 1996, p. 504, § 10.

53-3-4.
“Homestead” defined; taxes and tax liens.

As used in this Code section, the term “homestead” shall have the same meaning as set forth in Code Section 48-5-40.

In solvent and insolvent estates, all taxes and liens for taxes accrued for years prior to the year of the decedent’s death against the homestead set apart and against any equity of redemption applicable to the homestead set apart shall be divested as if the entire title were included in the year’s support. Additionally, as elected in the petition, property taxes accrued in the year of the decedent’s death or in the year in which the petition for year’s support is filed or, if the petition is filed in the year of the decedent’s death, in the year following the filing of the petition shall be divested if the homestead is set apart for year’s support; provided, however, that, if the property taxes elected in the petition pursuant to this paragraph are paid after the filing of the petition but prior to the entry of the order setting apart the homestead for year’s support, the property taxes accrued in the year following the year elected in the petition shall be divested instead.

In solvent and insolvent estates, if the homestead is not claimed, all taxes and liens for taxes accrued for years prior to the year of the decedent’s death against the real property set apart and against any equity of redemption applicable to the real property set apart shall be divested as if the entire title were included in the year’s support. Additionally, as elected in the petition, property taxes accrued in the year of the decedent’s death or in the year in which the petition for year’s support is filed or, if the petition is filed in the year of the decedent’s death, in the year following the filing of the petition shall be divested if the real property is set apart for year’s support; provided, however, that, if the property taxes elected in the petition pursuant to this paragraph are paid after the filing of the petition but prior to the entry of the order setting apart the real property for year’s support, the property taxes accrued in the year following the year elected in the petition shall be divested instead.

History.

Code 1981, §

53-3-4

, enacted by Ga. L. 1996, p. 504, § 10; Ga. L. 1998, p. 1586, § 12; Ga. L. 2016, p. 349, § 1/HB 547; Ga. L. 2020, p. 377, § 1-5/HB 865.

The 2020 amendment,

effective January 1, 2021, added the proviso at the end of paragraph (b)(1); and added the proviso at the end of paragraph (b)(2).

Law reviews.

For annual survey of wills, trusts, guardianships, and fiduciary administration, see 68 Mercer L. Rev. 321 (2016).

53-3-5.
Filing of petition.

Upon the death of any individual leaving an estate solvent or insolvent, the surviving spouse or a guardian or other person acting in behalf of the surviving spouse or in behalf of a minor child may file a petition for year’s support in the probate court having jurisdiction over the decedent’s estate. If the petition is brought by a guardian acting on behalf of a minor child, no additional guardian ad litem shall be appointed for such minor child unless ordered by the court.

The petition shall set forth, as applicable, the full name of the surviving spouse, the full name and birthdate of each surviving minor child, and a schedule of the property, including household furniture, that the petitioner proposes to have set apart as year’s support. The petition shall describe fully and accurately any real property the petitioner proposes to have set apart as year’s support with a legal description sufficient under the laws of this state to pass title to the real property.

A petition for year’s support shall be filed within 24 months of the date of death of the decedent.

History.

Code 1981, §

53-3-5

, enacted by Ga. L. 1996, p. 504, § 10; Ga. L. 1998, p. 1586, § 13; Ga. L. 2020, p. 377, § 1-6/HB 865.

The 2020 amendment,

effective January 1, 2021, in subsection (b), substituted “apart as year’s support” for “aside” twice; in the first sentence, inserted a comma following “child” and substituted “which” for “that”; and substituted “describe fully and accurately” for “fully and accurately describe” in the second sentence.

Law reviews.

For survey article on wills, trusts, guardianships, and fiduciary administration, see 60 Mercer L. Rev. 417 (2008).

For annual survey on wills, trusts, guardianships, and fiduciary administration, see 65 Mercer L. Rev. 295 (2013).

53-3-6.
Issuance of citation and publication of notice; mailing of petition to tax commissioner.

As used in this Code section, the term “interested persons” means the decedent’s children, spouse, other heirs, beneficiaries, and creditors and any others having a property right in or claim against the estate of the decedent that may be affected by the year’s support proceedings.

Upon the filing of the petition, the probate court shall issue a citation and publish a notice in the official newspaper of the county in which the petition is made once a week for four weeks, citing all interested persons to show cause by a date certain why the petition for year’s support should not be granted.

If there is a personal representative of the decedent’s estate, then, in addition to the issuance of citation and publication of notice required by subsection (b) of this Code section, the probate court shall cause a copy of the citation to be served upon the personal representative of the decedent’s estate. The personal representative shall be served not fewer than 30 days prior to the date and time for objections to be filed shown in the citation.

If there is no personal representative of the decedent’s estate, then, in addition to the issuance of citation and publication of notice required by subsection (b) of this Code section, the petitioner or the attorney for the petitioner shall file with the probate court an affidavit, upon oath, showing the name, last known address, and age if less than age 18 of each interested person and stating that the petitioner or the attorney for the petitioner has listed all known interested persons and has made reasonable inquiry to ascertain the names, last known addresses, and ages of all interested persons. The probate court shall serve by first-class mail a copy of the citation on each interested person shown on the affidavit not fewer than 30 days prior to the date and time shown in the citation for objections to be filed.

If the sole personal representative of the decedent’s estate and the petitioner or the guardian of the petitioner are the same person, then paragraph (2) of this subsection shall govern as if the decedent’s estate had no personal representative.

The probate court shall serve by first-class or interoffice mail, as applicable, a copy of the petition within five days of its filing on the tax commissioner or tax collector of any county in this state in which real property proposed to be set apart as year’s support is located.

History.

Code 1981, §

53-3-6

, enacted by Ga. L. 1996, p. 504, § 10; Ga. L. 1998, p. 1586, § 14; Ga. L. 2020, p. 377, § 1-7/HB 865; Ga. L. 2022, p. 352, § 53/HB 1428.

The 2020 amendment,

effective January 1, 2021, in subsection (a), substituted “ ‘interested persons’ ” for “ ‘interested person’ ”, “and creditors” for “creditors,”, and substituted “that” for “which”; in subsection (b), inserted “in the official newspaper of the county in which the petition is made”, substituted “interested persons” for “persons concerned”, and substituted “date” for “day”; in paragraph (c)(1), in the first sentence, substituted “issuance of citation and publication of notice” for “citation and notice” and substituted “served upon” for “sent by mail to” and in the second sentence, substituted “personal representative shall be served not fewer than 30 days” for “copy of the citation shall be mailed not less than 21 days” and inserted “for objections to be filed”; in paragraph (c)(2), substituted “issuance of citation and publication of notice” for “citation and notice” in the first sentence, in the second sentence, inserted “serve by first-class”, substituted “on” for “to”, substituted “fewer” for “less”, substituted “30” for “21”, and inserted “for objections to be filed”; and in subsection (d), substituted “serve by first class or interoffice mail, as applicable,” for “mail”, substituted “on” for “to”, and inserted “as year’s support”.

The 2022 amendment,

effective May 2, 2022, part of an Act to revise, modernize, and correct the Code, substituted “date and time shown in the citation for objections to be filed.” for “date and time for objections to be filed shown in the citation.” at the end of paragraph (c)(2).

Code Commission notes.

Pursuant to
Code Section 28-9-5, in 1996, the second enacted version of subsection (c) was redesignated as subsection (d).

Law reviews.

For article discussing decisions involving the year’s support provision of the Georgia Code, see 3 Ga. St. B.J. 427 (1967).

For article surveying wills, trusts, and administration of estates, see 34 Mercer L. Rev. 323 (1982).

53-3-7.
Hearing and determination.

If no objection is made after the publication of the notice, or, if made, is disallowed or withdrawn, the probate court shall enter an order setting apart as year’s support the property applied for in the petition.

If objection is made, the probate court shall hear the petition and, upon the evidence submitted, shall determine the property to be set apart as year’s support according to the standards set out in subsection (c) of this Code section. If an appeal is taken, pending the appeal the petitioners shall be furnished with necessaries by the personal representative or temporary administrator of the estate, as allowed by the probate court.

If objection is made to the amount or nature of the property proposed to be set apart as year’s support, the court shall set apart an amount sufficient to maintain the standard of living that the surviving spouse and each minor child had prior to the death of the decedent, taking into consideration the following:

The support available to the individual for whom the property is to be set apart from sources other than year’s support, including but not limited to the principal of any separate estate and the income and earning capacity of that individual;

The solvency of the estate; provided, however, that, if the decedent dies having a deposit in a financial institution that is applied to the payment of the funeral expenses and expenses of the last illness of the decedent under subsection (c) of Code Section 7-1-239, any effect such payment may have on the solvency of the estate shall not operate adversely to the surviving spouse or any minor child in the determination of the amount to be set apart as year’s support; and

Such other relevant criteria as the court deems equitable and proper.

The petitioner for year’s support shall have the burden of proof in showing the amount necessary for year’s support.

History.

Code 1981, §

53-3-7

, enacted by Ga. L. 1996, p. 504, § 10; Ga. L. 2020, p. 377, § 1-8/HB 865.

The 2020 amendment,

effective January 1, 2021, substituted “apart” for “aside” in subsection (a); in subsection (b), substituted “apart as year’s support” for “aside” in the first sentence and inserted “or temporary administrator” in the last sentence; and, in subsection (c), substituted “apart” for “aside” following “to be set” in the introductory language and added the proviso at the end of paragraph (c)(2).

Law reviews.

For article discussing decisions involving the year’s support provision of the Georgia Code, see 3 Ga. St. B.J. 427 (1967).

For article surveying wills, trusts, and administration of estates, see 34 Mercer L. Rev. 323 (1982).

For annual survey of law of wills, trusts, guardianships, and fiduciary administration, see 56 Mercer L. Rev. 457 (2004).

For survey article on wills, trusts, guardianships, and fiduciary administration, see 60 Mercer L. Rev. 417 (2008).

53-3-8.
Minor children by individuals other than surviving spouse.

If the decedent leaves a minor child or minor children by an individual or individuals other than the surviving spouse, the probate court shall specify the portion going to the minor child or minor children of such individual or individuals, and the portion so specified shall vest in that child or those children.

If the decedent leaves one or more minor children and the surviving spouse is the parent of all such minor children, the probate court may in its discretion specify separate portions for such minor children and the surviving spouse if the court deems the award of separate portions to be in the best interests of the parties, and the portions so specified shall vest separately in the surviving spouse and such minor children.

If the decedent leaves one or more minor children for whom the probate court specifies separate portions under subsection (a) or (b) of this Code section, personal property in the portions so specified shall be delivered and received in compliance with Code Section 29-3-1.

History.

Code 1981, §

53-3-8

, enacted by Ga. L. 1996, p. 504, § 10; Ga. L. 1997, p. 1352, § 6; Ga. L. 2020, p. 377, § 1-9/HB 865.

The 2020 amendment,

effective January 1, 2021, in subsection (a), inserted “a minor child or”, substituted “an individual or individuals other than the surviving spouse” for “different spouses”, inserted “minor child or minor”, substituted “such individual or individuals, and the portion so specified” for “the former spouse or spouses, which portion”, and inserted “that child or”; in subsection (b), inserted “one or more”, substituted “parent of all such” for “parent of the”, substituted “portions for such” for “portions for the”, inserted “so specified”, and substituted “spouse and such minor” for “spouse and the”; and added subsection (c).

Law reviews.

For article commenting on the 1997 amendment of this Code section, see 14 Ga. St. U.L. Rev. 313 (1997).

53-3-9.
Vesting of title to property set apart.

Except as otherwise provided in Code Section 53-3-8, title to the property set apart shall vest in the surviving spouse and child or children or, if there is no surviving spouse, in the children, share and share alike; and the property shall not be administered as the estate of the deceased spouse or parent.

When property is set apart as a year’s support for the benefit of the surviving spouse alone, the spouse shall thereafter own the same in fee, without restriction as to use, encumbrance, or disposition.

History.

Code 1981, §

53-3-9

, enacted by Ga. L. 1996, p. 504, § 10.

Law reviews.

For article discussing title by year’s support, see 2 Ga. B.J. 45 (1940).

53-3-10.
Property inside or outside county.

The probate court may award year’s support as to property located inside or outside the county where the decedent was domiciled at the time of death; and title to property both inside and outside the county where the decedent was domiciled at the time of death shall vest in the surviving spouse, spouse and children, or children only, as applicable.

History.

Code 1981, §

53-3-10

, enacted by Ga. L. 1996, p. 504, § 10.

53-3-11.
Awarding interest in real property.

When the probate court grants an order for year’s support which awards an interest in real property located in this state, within 30 days after granting the order the court shall cause a certificate for the order to be filed with the clerk of the superior court in the county of this state where the real property or any part of the real property is located. The certificate shall:

Identify in the manner provided in Code Section 53-3-5 those individuals receiving the interest;

Identify the interest received;

Contain a legal description sufficient under the laws of this state to pass title to the real property in which the interest was received, provided that the words “Also lands in County(ies),” which accurately identifies other counties within which the real property is located, shall be sufficient to describe real property located outside the county to which the order or a copy of the order was sent; and

Click to view

Contain a certification by the probate court that the information in the certificate is correct.

The certificate to be filed under subsection (a) of this Code section shall be accompanied by the same fee required for the filing of deeds with the clerk of the superior court. The filing fee and any fee for the certificate shall be taxed as costs to the estate.

The clerk of any superior court receiving the certificate provided in subsection (a) of this Code section shall file and record the certificate upon the deed records of that county. The certificate shall be indexed according to the names appearing on the certificate as follows:

The grantor is the name of decedent; and

The grantee is the name of the individual or individuals to whom the award was made.

Upon the filing and recording as provided in subsection (c) of this Code section, the certificate shall be returned to the probate court from whom it was received, for inclusion in the probate court’s permanent file. The probate court shall not be required to enter a certificate on the minutes of the court after the return of a certificate recorded under subsection (c) of this Code section.

History.

Code 1981, §

53-3-11

, enacted by Ga. L. 1996, p. 504, § 10.

Cross references.

Recording of deeds and other instruments generally, §

44-2-1

et seq.

53-3-12.
Fees.

The fees of the probate court shall be paid by the petitioner for year’s support out of the fund set apart for such petitioner or for the surviving spouse or a minor child in whose behalf the petitioner acted pursuant to subsection (a) of Code Section 53-3-5.

The probate court may issue a writ of fieri facias against the personal representative or temporary administrator of the estate for the amount awarded as provided in subsection (a) of this Code section.

The issuance by the probate court of a writ of fieri facias against the temporary administrator of the estate as provided in subsection (b) of this Code section shall be deemed a proper order under Code Section 53-7-4 for the payment by the temporary administrator of the amount awarded as provided in subsection (a) of this Code section.

History.

Code 1981, §

53-3-12

, enacted by Ga. L. 1996, p. 504, § 10; Ga. L. 2020, p. 377, § 1-10/HB 865.

The 2020 amendment,

effective January 1, 2021, added “for such petitioner or for the surviving spouse or a minor child in whose behalf the petitioner acted pursuant to subsection (a) of Code Section 53-3-5” at the end of subsection (a); inserted “or temporary administrator” in subsection (b); and added subsection (c).

53-3-13.
Sale or conveyance of property by personal representative or temporary administrator prior to award.

The right of a surviving spouse or minor child to year’s support from the estate of a decedent shall be barred by a sale or conveyance made prior to the award of year’s support by the personal representative or temporary administrator of the estate under authority of a court of competent jurisdiction or under power in a will; provided, however, that the sale or conveyance shall bar year’s support and rights to year’s support only as to the property sold or conveyed.

History.

Code 1981, §

53-3-13

, enacted by Ga. L. 1996, p. 504, § 10; Ga. L. 2020, p. 377, § 1-11/HB 865.

The 2020 amendment,

effective January 1, 2021, inserted “or temporary administrator” in this Code section.

53-3-14.
Real property subject to option to purchase or contract to sell.

If year’s support is set apart for the benefit of any individual in or with respect to real property on which there is a recorded option to purchase or contract to sell outstanding at the time the same is so set apart, the individual and any purchasers or lessees of the real property, after the same has been so set apart, shall take the real property or any interest therein subject to all of the rights and privileges of the grantee of the option or contract and of any assignees of the option or contract if the assignment or assignments are also recorded.

History.

Code 1981, §

53-3-14

, enacted by Ga. L. 1996, p. 504, § 10.

Law reviews.

For note, “Advantages and Disadvantages of Intestate Death for Married Persons With an Estate of $120,000 or Less,” see 9 Ga. St. B.J. 102 (1972).

53-3-15.
Conveyance, contract, or lien made by surviving spouse or guardian.

A conveyance, contract, or lien made or created by the surviving spouse or by the guardian of the minor child or children shall be superior to the title and interest of the surviving spouse or minor child or children under year’s support subsequently applied for and set apart.

History.

Code 1981, §

53-3-15

, enacted by Ga. L. 1996, p. 504, § 10.

53-3-16.
Real property subject to purchase money mortgage.

Whenever the vendor of real property makes a deed to such real property and takes a mortgage to secure the purchase money for such real property, neither the surviving spouse nor the children of the vendee shall be entitled to year’s support in the real property as against the vendor or the vendor’s heirs or assigns until the purchase money is fully paid.

History.

Code 1981, §

53-3-16

, enacted by Ga. L. 1996, p. 504, § 10.

Law reviews.

For comment on King v. Dalton,

85 Ga. App. 641

,

69 S.E.2d 907

(1952), see
15 Ga. B.J. 211 (1952).

53-3-17.
Personal property subject to mortgage or other security interest.

Whenever the vendor of personal property, at the time of selling and delivering such personal property, takes a mortgage or other security interest to secure the payment of the purchase money for such personal property, neither the surviving spouse nor the minor child or children of the vendee shall be entitled to year’s support in the personal property as against the vendor or the vendor’s heirs, personal representatives, or assigns until the purchase money of the personal property is fully paid; provided, however, that the mortgage or other security interest shall expressly state that the same is executed and delivered for the purpose of securing the debt for the purchase.

History.

Code 1981, §

53-3-17

, enacted by Ga. L. 1996, p. 504, § 10.

53-3-18.
Landlord’s lien on crops.

Whenever a tenant dies owing a landlord for rent or for supplies for which the landlord has a special lien on the crops made on the lands rented from the landlord in the year the rent accrued or supplies were furnished, neither the surviving spouse nor spouse and minor children nor minor child or children only of the tenant shall be entitled to year’s support out of the crops so planted or grown in that year as against the landlord until the accounts for the rent and supplies are fully paid, provided that the surviving spouse shall be entitled to year’s support in such part of the crop as may remain after the landlord’s lien for rent and supplies shall have been discharged.

History.

Code 1981, §

53-3-18

, enacted by Ga. L. 1996, p. 504, § 10.

53-3-19.
Conveyance or encumbrance by surviving spouse of property set aside; effect.

When property is set apart as year’s support for the joint benefit of the surviving spouse and the minor child or children, a conveyance or encumbrance of the same or any or all parts of such property by the surviving spouse shall convey or encumber the title and interest of the spouse and shall be binding and conclusive upon the spouse.

The conveyance or encumbrance of any or all the property set apart as year’s support for the joint benefit of the surviving spouse and the minor child or children shall convey or encumber and be binding and conclusive upon the child or children and person claiming through or under them only when approved by the probate court of the county in which the year’s support award was made. No such approval shall be necessary to bind a child who is sui juris and who joins with the surviving spouse in making the conveyance or encumbrance.

The purchaser or lender shall not be responsible for the proper use or application of the proceeds derived from a sale or encumbrance contemplated under this Code section.

History.

Code 1981, §

53-3-19

, enacted by Ga. L. 1996, p. 504, § 10.

53-3-20.
Conveyance or encumbrance by surviving spouse of property set aside; approval of probate court.

The approval of the probate court required by subsection (b) of Code Section 53-3-19 shall be obtained in the following manner: The surviving spouse shall petition the probate court, stating the purposes of the proposed conveyance or encumbrance and describing the property the spouse desires to convey or encumber, the nature of the proposed conveyance or encumbrance, and the names, last known addresses, and ages of the children for whose benefit the year’s support was set apart. If the surviving spouse has died, the petition may be made by the guardian for any one or more of the children for whose benefit the year’s support was set apart. The probate court shall set a date for hearing on the petition and shall appoint a guardian ad litem who shall accept the appointment in writing to represent the minor children. Not less than ten days prior to the date set for the hearing, personal service shall be made on each child for whose benefit the year’s support was set apart who has attained the age of 18 at the time the petition is filed. If the surviving spouse does not know and cannot easily ascertain the addresses of any of the children, service shall be made by publishing notice of the date and purpose of the hearing one time and by posting a copy of the notice at the courthouse not less than ten days prior to the date set for the hearing. In addition to publication, the probate court shall mail a copy of the notice to the last known address of each child whose current address is unknown, not less than ten days prior to the date set for such hearing. Objections, if any, shall be made in writing.

At the hearing, the probate court shall determine that service has been made as required by this Code section and that the purpose or purposes of the proposed conveyance or encumbrance are proper and shall pass an order reciting due compliance with this Code section and approval of the proposed conveyance or encumbrance, which order shall be final and conclusive.

The proceedings shall be indexed and recorded in books to be kept for that purpose by the probate court in each county in which any of the property is located.

An appeal shall lie in the manner, under the restrictions, and with the effect provided for appeals from the probate court in other cases.

History.

Code 1981, §

53-3-20

, enacted by Ga. L. 1996, p. 504, § 10.

53-3-21.
Appointment of temporary administrator.

If there is no personal representative of the decedent’s estate, the probate court may appoint a temporary administrator as provided in Code Section 53-6-30 to perform the duties of a personal representative under subsection (b) of Code Section 53-3-7 or under subsection (b) of Code Section 53-3-12; provided, however, that the appointment of such temporary administrator shall not alter or affect the citation, notice, and mailing requirements of Code Section 53-3-6.

History.

Code 1981, §

53-3-21

, enacted by Ga. L. 2020, p. 377, § 1-12/HB 865.

Effective date. —

This Code section became effective January 1, 2021.

Law reviews.

For article with annual survey on wills, trusts, guardianships, and fiduciary administration, see 73 Mercer L. Rev. 281 (2021).